District of Columbia statutes.
8-1425

Penalties.

(a)

Any person who violates § 8-1423 or rules issued under § 8-1426 shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed:

(1)

$10,000 for a first offense; or

(2)

$25,000 for any subsequent offense.

(b)

The fines assessed and collected under subsection (a) of this section shall be deposited into the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

History

Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-80, § 6, 53 DCR 1047

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 6 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Temporary Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-2, May 14, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 5425).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-43, February 15, 2005, 52 DCR 3048).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-90, June 1, 2005, 52 DCR 5428).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6 of Second Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-236, December 22, 2005, 53 DCR 245).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-325, March 23, 2006, 53 DCR 2576).